Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-113
Violations; penalty.

If any justice, minister, or other person whose duty it is to make and transmit to the county clerk such certificate shall neglect to make and deliver the same; if the county clerk shall neglect to record such certificate; if any person shall undertake to join others in marriage, knowing that he or she is not legally authorized so to do or knowing of any legal impediment to the proposed marriage; if any person authorized to solemnize any marriage shall willfully and knowingly make a false certificate of any marriage to the county clerk; or if the county clerk shall willfully and knowingly make a false record of any certificate of marriage, he or she shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

R.S.1866, c. 34, § 13, p. 255;

R.S.1913, § 1552;

C.S.1922, § 1501;

C.S.1929, § 42-113;

R.S.1943, § 42-113;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 225;

Laws 1986, LB 525, § 10.